Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1601
Life insurance; policy; issuance; requirements.

No policy of group life insurance shall be delivered in this state unless it is issued under one of the provisions of sections 21-1740, 44-1602 to 44-1606.03, and 44-1615 or under a policy or contract issued to any other substantially similar group which, in the discretion of the Director of Insurance, may be subject to the issuance of a group life insurance policy or contract.

Laws 1949, c. 150, § 1(1), p. 377;

Laws 1961, c. 210, § 5, p. 628;

Laws 1969, c. 361, § 3, p. 1286;

Laws 1983, LB 298, § 1;

Laws 1996, LB 948, § 123;

Laws 2008, LB855, § 8.